Mississippi, session 2026, HB1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is created a task force to study the practice of adding of fluoride in water systems for the protection of oral health to determine if there are negative consequences to community water fluoridation and whether they outweigh the positive effects. (2)  The task force shall be composed of the following members: (a)  Three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House, and three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (b)  The Executive Director of the State Department of Health or his or her designee; and (c)  Two (2) members appointed by the Executive Director of the State Department of Health. (3)  Appointments to the task force shall be made within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this section.  Within fifteen (15) days thereafter on a day to be designated jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Lieutenant Governor, the task force shall meet and organize by selecting from its membership a chair and a vice chair.  The vice chair shall also serve as secretary and shall be responsible for keeping all records of the task force. A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.  In the selection of its officers and the adoption of rules, resolutions and reports, an affirmative vote of a majority of the task force shall be required.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, and those notices shall be mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held. (4)  The task force shall meet at least once quarterly, and shall complete its study and present its conclusions, together with any recommended legislation, to the Legislature not later than December 1, 2026, at which time the task force will be dissolved. (5)  Members of the task force shall receive no compensation for their service on the task force, but members of the task force who are not state employees may receive reimbursement for mileage and actual expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41 to the extent that funds are available for that purpose. (6)  The State Department of Health shall provide the staff and other support necessary for the task force to perform its duties. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.